Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-3607
Act; how construed.

Nothing in the Youth Reentry and Transitional Support Act shall be construed to require:

(1) The Office of Probation Administration to provide services to a youth after a term of probation has ended; or

(2) The Department of Health and Human Services or Office of Juvenile Services to provide services to a youth after the youth has left the care, custody, and control of the department.

Laws 2026, LB962, § 7.
December 1, 2026